Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0572.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) The board shall promulgate rules for the safe construction, installation, repair, use, operation, maintenance, and inspection of all ski areas and ski lifts as the board finds necessary for protection of the general public while using ski areas and ski lifts. The rules shall must be reasonable and based upon on generally accepted engineering standards, formulas, and practices. (2) The board, with the advice of the commissioner, shall propose legislation to establish the fee schedule for permits, inspections, and plan review activities. The fees shall reflect the actual costs and expenses of the department for issuing permits and conducting inspections and plan reviews. Sec. 16. (a) An application for a permit shall be accompanied by fees of: $25.00 for an annual permit; or $2.00 for each rope tow, $5.00 for each T bar, J bar or platter pull, $15.00 for each chair lift or skimobile, and $30.00 for each aerial tramway, if greater than the $25.00 annual permit fee. (1) The department may promulgate rules to establish the fee schedule for permits, inspections, and other activities under this act. An application for a permit must be accompanied by a permit processing fee. (2) By August 1 of each year, the department shall provide to the director of the department of technology, management, and budget and the chairpersons of the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives a complete schedule of fees to be collected under this section for the following fiscal year. The schedule may increase the fees currently in effect by an amount equal to not more than the average percentage wage and salary increase granted for the following fiscal year to classified civil service employees employed by the department. (3) The annual permit processing fee is as follows, based on the time of payment, and subject to subsection (2): (a) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $50.00. (b) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $100.00. (c) After September 30, 2026, $150.00. (4) (b) Inspection fees shall be are as follows, based on the time of payment, and subject to subsection (2): $8.00 for each rope tow, $20.00 for each T bar, J bar or platter pull, $60.00 for each chair lift or skimobile, $120.00 for each aerial tramway, and $50.00 (a) Rope tow inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $8.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $16.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $25.00. (b) Surface lift inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $13.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $26.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $40.00. (c) Conveyer inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $8.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $16.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $25.00. (d) Fixed grip chair inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $120.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $240.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $350.00. (e) Detachable chair inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $230.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $460.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $700.00. (f) Gondolas per cabin inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $12.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $24.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $35.00. (5) Fees for reinspections or special inspections at an operator's request . are as follows, based on the time of payment, and subject to subsection (2): (a) Rope tow inspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $4.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $8.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $12.50. (b) Surface lift reinspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $7.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $14.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $20.00. (c) Conveyer reinspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $4.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $8.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $12.50. (d) Fixed grip chair reinspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $58.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $116.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $175.00. (e) Detachable chair reinspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $120.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $240.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $350.00. (f) Gondolas per cabin reinspection or special inspection fees: (i) Beginning October 1, 2024, through September 30, 2025, $6.00. (ii) After September 30, 2025, through September 30, 2026, $12.00. (iii) After September 30, 2026, $17.50. (6) Fees for review and approval of plans before construction are as follows, subject to subsection (2): (a) Chair lift - $200.00. (b) T bar - $200.00. (c) J bar - $200.00. (d) Platter pull - $200.00. (e) Tramway - $200.00. (7) The fee for review and approval of plans for modification and alteration of an existing lift is $50.00, subject to subsection (2). (8) Any operator may employ any person, partnership, or corporation, approved by the commissioner and board, to make the inspections. Inspections Inspection reports made by any person, partnership, or corporation , that may be employed by an operator , shall must be on forms furnished or approved by the department. Inspection The department shall waive inspection fees shall be waived when if the annual permit application is accompanied by such an inspection report. (c) Fees for review and approval of plans prior to construction shall be $200.00 for a chair lift, T bar, J bar, platter pull or tramway. Fees for review and approval of plans for modification and alteration of an existing lift shall be $50.00. (9) (d) Fees shall be paid The operator must pay the fees to the department, which shall give receipts therefor.for payment.